Colorado, session 2026A, SB075.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 16-1-104, amend
(8.5)(a)(I) as follows:
16-1-104. Definitions.
(8.5) (a) (I) "Crime of violence" means a crime in which the
-2- SB26-075

defendant used, or possessed and threatened the use of, a deadly weapon
during the commission or attempted commission of any crime committed
against an elderly person or a person with a disability or a crime of
murder, first or second degree assault, kidnapping, sexual assault,
robbery, first degree arson, first or second degree burglary, escape, OR
criminal extortion, human trafficking for involuntary servitude of an adult
or a minor, or human trafficking for sexual servitude of an adult or a
minor, or during the immediate flight therefrom, or the defendant caused
serious bodily injury or death to any person, other than to the defendant
or another participant, during the commission or attempted commission
of the felony or during the immediate flight therefrom.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 18-1.3-401, add (15)
as follows:
18-1.3-401. Felonies classified - presumptive penalties.
(15) (a) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF THIS
SECTION, THE COURT SHALL SENTENCE A PERSON CONVICTED OF THE
CLASS 3 FELONY OF HUMAN TRAFFICKING FOR INVOLUNTARY SERVITUDE
PURSUANT TO SECTION 18-3-503 OR THE CLASS 3 FELONY OF HUMAN
TRAFFICKING FOR SEXUAL SERVITUDE PURSUANT TO SECTION 18-3-504 TO
A TERM OF AT LEAST THE MIDPOINT, BUT NOT MORE THAN TWICE THE
MAXIMUM, OF THE PRESUMPTIVE RANGE AUTHORIZED FOR THE
PUNISHMENT OF THE OFFENSE IN SUBSECTION (1)(a) OF THIS SECTION, AS
MODIFIED FOR AN EXTRAORDINARY RISK CRIME PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION
(10) OF THIS SECTION.
(b) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF THIS SECTION,
THE COURT SHALL SENTENCE A PERSON CONVICTED OF THE CLASS 2
FELONY OF HUMAN TRAFFICKING OF A MINOR FOR INVOLUNTARY
-3- SB26-075

SERVITUDE PURSUANT TO SECTION 18-3-503 OR THE CLASS 2 FELONY OF
HUMAN TRAFFICKING OF A MINOR FOR SEXUAL SERVITUDE PURSUANT TO
SECTION 18-3-504 TO A TERM OF AT LEAST THE MIDPOINT, BUT NOT MORE
THAN TWICE THE MAXIMUM, OF THE PRESUMPTIVE RANGE AUTHORIZED
FOR THE PUNISHMENT OF THE OFFENSE IN SUBSECTION (1)(a) OF THIS
SECTION.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 18-1.3-406, amend
(2)(a)(II)(J); and repeal (2)(a)(II)(L) and (2)(a)(II)(M) as follows:
18-1.3-406. Mandatory sentences for violent crimes -
definitions.
(2) (a) (II) Subsection (2)(a)(I) of this section applies to the
following crimes:
(J) Criminal extortion; OR
(L) Human trafficking for involuntary servitude of an adult or a
minor in violation of section 18-3-503; or
(M) Human trafficking for sexual servitude of an adult or a minor
in violation of section 18-3-504.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 18-3-503, add (2.5)
as follows:
18-3-503. Human trafficking for involuntary servitude -
human trafficking of a minor for involuntary servitude.
(2.5) (a) THE COURT SHALL SENTENCE A PERSON CONVICTED OF
HUMAN TRAFFICKING FOR INVOLUNTARY SERVITUDE OR HUMAN
TRAFFICKING OF A MINOR FOR INVOLUNTARY SERVITUDE IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THE PROVISIONS OF SECTION 18-1.3-401 (15).
(b) (I) IF A PERSON IS CONVICTED OF COMMITTING, CONSPIRING TO
COMMIT, OR ATTEMPTING TO COMMIT HUMAN TRAFFICKING FOR
-4- SB26-075

INVOLUNTARY SERVITUDE PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION,
THE COURT SHALL SENTENCE THE PERSON TO THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS FOR A TERM OF INCARCERATION OF AT LEAST THE MIDPOINT
IN, BUT NOT MORE THAN TWICE THE MAXIMUM OF, THE PRESUMPTIVE
RANGE PROVIDED FOR THE OFFENSE IN SECTION 18-1.3-401 (1)(a), AS
MODIFIED FOR AN EXTRAORDINARY RISK CRIME PURSUANT TO SECTION
18-1.3-401 (10).
(II) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTION (2.5)(b)(I) OF THIS SECTION,
IF A PERSON IS CONVICTED OF COMMITTING, CONSPIRING TO COMMIT, OR
ATTEMPTING TO COMMIT HUMAN TRAFFICKING OF A MINOR FOR
INVOLUNTARY SERVITUDE PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION, THE COURT SHALL
SENTENCE THE PERSON TO THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS FOR A TERM
OF INCARCERATION OF AT LEAST THE MIDPOINT IN, BUT NOT MORE THAN
TWICE THE MAXIMUM OF, THE PRESUMPTIVE RANGE PROVIDED FOR THE
OFFENSE IN SECTION 18-1.3-401 (1)(a).
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 18-3-504, amend
(1)(b) and (2)(b); and add (1)(c) and (2)(d) as follows:
18-3-504. Human trafficking for sexual servitude - human
trafficking of a minor for sexual servitude.
(1) (b) Human trafficking for sexual servitude is a class 3 felony.
THE COURT SHALL SENTENCE A PERSON CONVICTED OF HUMAN
TRAFFICKING FOR SEXUAL SERVITUDE IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE
PROVISIONS OF SECTION 18-1.3-401 (15).
(c) IF A PERSON IS CONVICTED OF COMMITTING, CONSPIRING TO
COMMIT, OR ATTEMPTING TO COMMIT HUMAN TRAFFICKING FOR SEXUAL
SERVITUDE PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (1)(a) OF THIS SECTION, THE COURT
SHALL SENTENCE THE PERSON TO THE DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS FOR
-5- SB26-075

A TERM OF INCARCERATION OF AT LEAST THE MIDPOINT IN, BUT NOT MORE
THAN TWICE THE MAXIMUM OF, THE PRESUMPTIVE RANGE PROVIDED FOR
THE OFFENSE IN SECTION 18-1.3-401 (1)(a), AS MODIFIED FOR AN
EXTRAORDINARY RISK CRIME PURSUANT TO SECTION 18-1.3-401 (10).
(2) (b) Human trafficking of a minor for sexual servitude is a class
2 felony. The court shall sentence a person convicted of such a class 2
felony to the department of corrections for a term of at least the minimum
of the presumptive range for a class 2 felony, as set forth in section
18-1.3-401. THE COURT SHALL SENTENCE A PERSON CONVICTED OF
HUMAN TRAFFICKING OF A MINOR FOR SEXUAL SERVITUDE IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THE PROVISIONS OF SECTION 18-1.3-401 (15).
(d) IF A PERSON IS CONVICTED OF COMMITTING, CONSPIRING TO
COMMIT, OR ATTEMPTING TO COMMIT HUMAN TRAFFICKING OF A MINOR
FOR SEXUAL SERVITUDE PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2)(a) OF THIS
SECTION, THE COURT SHALL SENTENCE THE PERSON TO THE DEPARTMENT
OF CORRECTIONS FOR A TERM OF INCARCERATION OF AT LEAST THE
MIDPOINT IN, BUT NOT MORE THAN TWICE THE MAXIMUM OF, THE
PRESUMPTIVE RANGE PROVIDED FOR THE OFFENSE IN SECTION 18-1.3-401
(1)(a).
SECTION 6. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 18-6.5-103, add (10)
and (11) as follows:
18-6.5-103. Crimes against at-risk persons - classifications.
(10) (a) A PERSON WHO COMMITS HUMAN TRAFFICKING FOR
INVOLUNTARY SERVITUDE, AS THE CRIME IS DESCRIBED IN SECTION
18-3-503, AND THE VICTIM IS AN AT-RISK ADULT, COMMITS A CLASS 2
FELONY.
(b) A PERSON WHO COMMITS HUMAN TRAFFICKING FOR SEXUAL
-6- SB26-075

SERVITUDE, AS THE CRIME IS DESCRIBED IN SECTION 18-3-504 (1)(a), AND
THE VICTIM IS AN AT-RISK ADULT, COMMITS A CLASS 2 FELONY.
(11) (a) (I) A PERSON COMMITS PIMPING OF AN AT-RISK ADULT
WHEN THE PERSON KNOWINGLY LIVES ON OR IS SUPPORTED OR
MAINTAINED IN WHOLE OR IN PART BY MONEY OR OTHER THING OF VALUE
EARNED, RECEIVED, PROCURED, OR REALIZED BY AN AT-RISK ADULT
THROUGH PROSTITUTION.
(II) PIMPING OF AN AT-RISK ADULT IS A CLASS 2 FELONY.
(b) (I) A PERSON COMMITS PIMPING OF AN AT-RISK JUVENILE WHEN
THE PERSON KNOWINGLY LIVES ON OR IS SUPPORTED OR MAINTAINED IN
WHOLE OR IN PART BY MONEY OR OTHER THING OF VALUE EARNED,
RECEIVED, PROCURED, OR REALIZED BY AN AT-RISK JUVENILE THROUGH
COMMERCIAL SEXUAL ACTIVITY.
(II) PIMPING OF AN AT-RISK JUVENILE IS A CLASS 2 FELONY.
SECTION 7. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 16-4-103, amend
(5)(i) and (5)(j); and add (5)(k) as follows:
16-4-103. Setting and selection type of bond - criteria.
(5) The court may also consider the following criteria as
appropriate and relevant in making a determination of the type of bond
and conditions of release:
(i) Any facts indicating that the defendant is likely to intimidate
or harass possible witnesses; and
(j) Any other facts tending to indicate that the person in custody
has strong ties to the community and is not likely to flee the jurisdiction;
AND
(k) THE SOURCE OF MONEY THE DEFENDANT MAY POST WITH THE
COURT TO SATISFY A MONETARY CONDITION OF RELEASE, INCLUDING THE
-7- SB26-075

LIKELIHOOD THAT THE MONEY IS DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY DERIVED FROM
CRIMINAL ACTIVITY.
SECTION 8. In Colorado Revised Statutes, repeal and reenact,
with amendments, 18-7-401 as follows:
18-7-401. Definitions.
AS USED IN THIS PART 4, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(1) "CHILD" MEANS A PERSON WHO IS UNDER EIGHTEEN YEARS
OLD.
(2) "COMMERCIAL SEXUAL ACTIVITY" MEANS PERFORMING OR
OFFERING OR AGREEING TO PERFORM A SEXUAL ACTIVITY FOR WHICH A
PERSON GIVES, PROMISES, OR RECEIVES ANYTHING OF VALUE.
(3) "SEXUAL ACTIVITY" MEANS SEXUAL CONTACT, SEXUAL
INTRUSION, OR SEXUAL PENETRATION, AS EACH TERM IS DEFINED IN
SECTION 18-3-401.
SECTION 9. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 18-7-402 as
follows:
18-7-402. Soliciting for commercial sexual activity with a
child.
(1) A person commits soliciting for child prostitution if he
COMMERCIAL SEXUAL ACTIVITY WITH A CHILD IF THE PERSON:
(a) KNOWINGLY SOLICITS A CHILD FOR COMMERCIAL SEXUAL
ACTIVITY;
(a) (b) KNOWINGLY solicits another for the purpose of prostitution
of a child or by a child COMMERCIAL SEXUAL ACTIVITY WITH A CHILD;
(b) (c) Arranges or offers to arrange a meeting of persons for the
purpose of prostitution of a child or by a child KNOWING THE MEETING
-8- SB26-075

WILL FACILITATE COMMERCIAL SEXUAL ACTIVITY WITH A CHILD; or
(c) (d) Directs another to a place knowing such THE direction is
for the purpose of prostitution of a child or by a child WILL FACILITATE
COMMERCIAL SEXUAL ACTIVITY WITH A CHILD.
(2) Soliciting for child prostitution COMMERCIAL SEXUAL
ACTIVITY WITH A CHILD is a class 3 felony.
SECTION 10. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 18-7-403 as
follows:
18-7-403. Pandering of a child.
(1) Any A person who does any of the following for money or
other thing of value commits pandering of a child:
(a) Inducing a child by menacing or criminal intimidation to
commit prostitution ENGAGE IN COMMERCIAL SEXUAL ACTIVITY; or
(b) Knowingly arranging or offering to arrange a situation in
which a child may practice prostitution ENGAGE IN COMMERCIAL SEXUAL
ACTIVITY.
(2) (a) Pandering under paragraph (a) of subsection (1) OF A CHILD
PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (1)(a) of this section is a class 2 felony.
(b) Pandering under paragraph (b) of subsection (1) OF A CHILD
PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (1)(b) of this section is a class 3 felony.
SECTION 11. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 18-7-403.5
as follows:
18-7-403.5. Procurement of a child.
(1) Any A person who intentionally gives, transports, provides, or
makes available, or who offers to give, transport, provide, or make
available, to another person a child for the purpose of prostitution of the
child COMMERCIAL SEXUAL ACTIVITY commits procurement of a child.
-9- SB26-075

which is a class 3 felony.
(2) PROCUREMENT OF A CHILD IS A CLASS 3 FELONY.
SECTION 12. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 18-7-404 as
follows:
18-7-404. Keeping a place for commercial sexual activity with
a child.
(1) Any A person who has or exercises control over the use of any
A place which THAT offers seclusion or shelter for the practice of
prostitution and who performs any one or more of the following
COMMERCIAL SEXUAL ACTIVITY WITH A CHILD commits keeping a place
of child prostitution COMMERCIAL SEXUAL ACTIVITY WITH A CHILD if he
THE PERSON:
(a) Knowingly grants or permits the use of such THE place for the
purpose of prostitution of a child or by a child COMMERCIAL SEXUAL
ACTIVITY WITH A CHILD; or
(b) Permits the continued use of such THE place for the purpose
of prostitution of a child or by a child COMMERCIAL SEXUAL ACTIVITY
WITH A CHILD after becoming aware of facts or circumstances from which
he THE PERSON should reasonably know that the place is being used for
purposes of such prostitution COMMERCIAL SEXUAL ACTIVITY WITH A
CHILD.
(2) Keeping a place of child prostitution COMMERCIAL SEXUAL
ACTIVITY WITH A CHILD is a class 3 felony.
SECTION 13. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 18-7-405 as
follows:
18-7-405. Pimping of a child.
(1) Any A person who knowingly lives on or is supported or
-10- SB26-075

maintained in whole or in part by money or other thing of value earned,
received, procured, or realized by a child through prostitution
COMMERCIAL SEXUAL ACTIVITY commits pimping of a child. which is a
class 3 felony.
(2) PIMPING OF A CHILD IS A CLASS 3 FELONY.
SECTION 14. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 18-7-405.5
as follows:
18-7-405.5. Inducement of commercial sexual activity with a
child.
(1) Any A person who by word or action, other than conduct
specified in section 18-7-403 (1)(a), induces a child to engage in an act
which is prostitution by a child, as defined in section 18-7-401 (6),
COMMERCIAL SEXUAL ACTIVITY commits inducement of child prostitution
COMMERCIAL SEXUAL ACTIVITY WITH A CHILD.
(2) Inducement of child prostitution COMMERCIAL SEXUAL
ACTIVITY WITH A CHILD is a class 3 felony.
SECTION 15. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 18-7-406 as
follows:
18-7-406. Engaging in commercial sexual activity with a child.
(1) Any A person who performs any of the following with a child
WHO IS not his THEIR spouse commits patronizing a prostituted child
ENGAGING IN COMMERCIAL SEXUAL ACTIVITY WITH A CHILD:
(a) Engages in an act which is prostitution of a child or by a child,
as defined in section 18-7-401 (6) or (7) COMMERCIAL SEXUAL ACTIVITY
WITH A CHILD; or
(b) Enters or remains in a place of prostitution FOR COMMERCIAL
SEXUAL ACTIVITY WITH A CHILD with intent to engage in an act which is
-11- SB26-075

prostitution of a child or by a child, as defined in section 18-7-401 (6) or
(7) COMMERCIAL SEXUAL ACTIVITY WITH A CHILD.
(2) Patronizing a prostituted child ENGAGING IN COMMERCIAL
SEXUAL ACTIVITY WITH A CHILD is a class 3 felony.
SECTION 16. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 14-10-129, amend
(3)(b) introductory portion, (3)(b)(XIV), (3)(b)(XVII), (3)(b)(XIX),
(3)(b)(XX), and (3)(c); and add (3)(b)(XXI), (3)(b)(XXII), (3)(b)(XXIII),
and (3)(b)(XXIV) as follows:
14-10-129. Modification of parenting time.
(3) (b) The provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection (3) shall
apply SUBSECTION (3)(a) OF THIS SECTION APPLIES to the following
crimes:
(XIV) Soliciting for child prostitution, as defined in section
18-7-402, C.R.S. AS IT EXISTED PRIOR TO JULY 1, 2026;
(XVII) Keeping a place of child prostitution, as defined in section
18-7-404, C.R.S. AS IT EXISTED PRIOR TO JULY 1, 2026;
(XIX) Inducement of child prostitution, as defined in section
18-7-405.5, C.R.S. AS IT EXISTED PRIOR TO JULY 1, 2026;
(XX) Patronizing a prostituted child, as defined in section
18-7-406, C.R.S. AS IT EXISTED PRIOR TO JULY 1, 2026;
(XXI) SOLICITING FOR COMMERCIAL SEXUAL ACTIVITY WITH A
CHILD, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 18-7-402;
(XXII) KEEPING A PLACE OF COMMERCIAL SEXUAL ACTIVITY WITH
A CHILD, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 18-7-404;
(XXIII) INDUCEMENT OF COMMERCIAL SEXUAL ACTIVITY WITH A
CHILD, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 18-7-405.5;
(XXIV) ENGAGING IN COMMERCIAL SEXUAL ACTIVITY WITH A
-12- SB26-075

CHILD, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 18-7-406.
(c) If the party was convicted in another state or jurisdiction of an
offense that, if committed in Colorado, would constitute an offense listed
in subparagraphs (III) to (XX) of paragraph (b) of this subsection (3)
SUBSECTIONS (3)(b)(III) TO (3)(b)(XXIV) OF THIS SECTION, the court shall
order that party to submit to a sex-offense-specific evaluation and a
parental risk assessment in Colorado, and the court shall consider the
recommendations of the evaluation and the assessment in any order the
court makes relating to parenting time or parental contact. The convicted
party shall pay for the costs of the evaluation and the assessment.
SECTION 17. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 16-8-115, amend
(4)(g)(XIV), (4)(g)(XVII), (4)(g)(XIX), and (4)(g)(XX); and add
(4)(g)(XX.5) as follows:
16-8-115. Release from commitment after verdict of not guilty
by reason of insanity or not guilty by reason of impaired mental
condition - definitions.
(4) (g) As used in this subsection (4), "an offense involving
unlawful sexual behavior" means any of the following offenses:
(XIV) Soliciting for child prostitution SOLICITING FOR
COMMERCIAL SEXUAL ACTIVITY WITH A CHILD, in violation of section
18-7-402; C.R.S.;
(XVII) Keeping a place of child prostitution KEEPING A PLACE OF
COMMERCIAL SEXUAL ACTIVITY WITH A CHILD, in violation of section
18-7-404; C.R.S.;
(XIX) Inducement of child prostitution INDUCEMENT OF
COMMERCIAL SEXUAL ACTIVITY WITH A CHILD, in violation of section
18-7-405.5; C.R.S.;
-13- SB26-075

(XX) Patronizing a prostituted child ENGAGING IN COMMERCIAL
SEXUAL ACTIVITY WITH A CHILD, in violation of section 18-7-406; C.R.S.;
or
(XX.5) AS EACH OF THE FOLLOWING OFFENSES EXISTED PRIOR TO
JULY 1, 2026: SOLICITING FOR CHILD PROSTITUTION, IN VIOLATION OF
SECTION 18-7-402; KEEPING A PLACE OF CHILD PROSTITUTION, IN
VIOLATION OF SECTION 18-7-404; INDUCEMENT OF CHILD PROSTITUTION,
IN VIOLATION OF SECTION 18-7-405.5; OR PATRONIZING A PROSTITUTED
CHILD, IN VIOLATION OF SECTION 18-7-406; OR
SECTION 18. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 16-11.7-102,
amend (3) introductory portion, (3)(n), (3)(q), (3)(s), and (3)(t); and add
(3)(t.5) as follows:
16-11.7-102. Definitions.
As used in this article 11.7, unless the context otherwise requires:
(3) "Sex offense" means any OF THE FOLLOWING felony or
misdemeanor offense described in this subsection (3) as follows
OFFENSES:
(n) Soliciting for child prostitution SOLICITING FOR COMMERCIAL
SEXUAL ACTIVITY WITH A CHILD, in violation of section 18-7-402; C.R.S.;
(q) Keeping a place of child prostitution KEEPING A PLACE OF
COMMERCIAL SEXUAL ACTIVITY WITH A CHILD, in violation of section
18-7-404; C.R.S.;
(s) Inducement of child prostitution INDUCEMENT OF COMMERCIAL
SEXUAL ACTIVITY WITH A CHILD, in violation of section 18-7-405.5;
C.R.S.;
(t) Patronizing a prostituted child ENGAGING IN COMMERCIAL
SEXUAL ACTIVITY WITH A CHILD, in violation of section 18-7-406; C.R.S.;
-14- SB26-075

(t.5) AS EACH OF THE FOLLOWING OFFENSES EXISTED PRIOR TO
JULY 1, 2026: SOLICITING FOR CHILD PROSTITUTION, IN VIOLATION OF
SECTION 18-7-402; KEEPING A PLACE OF CHILD PROSTITUTION, IN
VIOLATION OF SECTION 18-7-404; INDUCEMENT OF CHILD PROSTITUTION,
IN VIOLATION OF SECTION 18-7-405.5; OR PATRONIZING A PROSTITUTED
CHILD, IN VIOLATION OF SECTION 18-7-406;
SECTION 19. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 16-13-303, amend
(1) introductory portion and (1)(g); and add (1)(g.1) as follows:
16-13-303. Class 1 public nuisance.
(1) Every building or part of a building, including the ground
upon which it is situate and all fixtures and contents thereof, every
vehicle, and any real property shall be IS deemed a class 1 public nuisance
when:
(g) Used for prostitution of a child, as defined in section 18-7-401,
C.R.S. AS IT EXISTED PRIOR TO JULY 1, 2026, or used as a place where the
commission of ANY OF THE FOLLOWING, AS THEY EXISTED PRIOR TO JULY
1, 2026, OCCURRED: Soliciting for child prostitution, as defined in section
18-7-402; C.R.S., pandering of a child, as defined in section 18-7-403,
C.R.S., keeping a place of child prostitution, as defined in section
18-7-404; C.R.S., pimping of a child, as defined in section 18-7-405,
C.R.S., or inducement of child prostitution, as defined in section
18-7-405.5; C.R.S., occurs;
(g.1) USED AS A PLACE WHERE THE COMMISSION OF ANY OF THE
FOLLOWING OCCURS: SOLICITING FOR COMMERCIAL SEXUAL ACTIVITY
WITH A CHILD, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 18-7-402; PANDERING OF A CHILD,
AS DEFINED IN SECTION 18-7-403; KEEPING A PLACE OF COMMERCIAL
SEXUAL ACTIVITY WITH A CHILD, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 18-7-404;
-15- SB26-075

PIMPING OF A CHILD, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 18-7-405; OR INDUCEMENT
OF COMMERCIAL SEXUAL ACTIVITY WITH A CHILD, AS DEFINED IN SECTION
18-7-405.5;
SECTION 20. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 16-22-102, amend
(9)(n), (9)(q), (9)(s), and (9)(t); and add (9)(t.5) as follows:
16-22-102. Definitions.
As used in this article 22, unless the context otherwise requires:
(9) "Unlawful sexual behavior" means any of the following
offenses or criminal attempt, conspiracy, or solicitation to commit any of
the following offenses:
(n) Soliciting for child prostitution SOLICITING FOR COMMERCIAL
SEXUAL ACTIVITY WITH A CHILD, in violation of section 18-7-402; C.R.S.;
(q) Keeping a place of child prostitution KEEPING A PLACE OF
COMMERCIAL SEXUAL ACTIVITY WITH A CHILD, in violation of section
18-7-404; C.R.S.;
(s) Inducement of child prostitution INDUCEMENT OF COMMERCIAL
SEXUAL ACTIVITY WITH A CHILD, in violation of section 18-7-405.5;
C.R.S.;
(t) Patronizing a prostituted child ENGAGING IN COMMERCIAL
SEXUAL ACTIVITY WITH A CHILD, in violation of section 18-7-406; C.R.S.;
(t.5) AS EACH OF THE FOLLOWING OFFENSES EXISTED PRIOR TO
JULY 1, 2026: SOLICITING FOR CHILD PROSTITUTION, IN VIOLATION OF
SECTION 18-7-402; KEEPING A PLACE OF CHILD PROSTITUTION, IN
VIOLATION OF SECTION 18-7-404; INDUCEMENT OF CHILD PROSTITUTION,
IN VIOLATION OF SECTION 18-7-405.5; OR PATRONIZING A PROSTITUTED
CHILD, IN VIOLATION OF SECTION 18-7-406;
SECTION 21. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 16-22-108, amend
-16- SB26-075

(2.5)(c) as follows:
16-22-108. Registration - procedure - frequency - place -
change of address - fee.
(2.5) (c) For purposes of this section, "child sex crime" means:
(I) Sexual assault on a child, as described in section 18-3-405;
C.R.S.; sexual assault on a child by one in a position of trust, as described
in section 18-3-405.3; C.R.S.; unlawful sexual contact, as described in
section 18-3-404 (1.5); C.R.S.; enticement of a child, as described in
section 18-3-305; C.R.S.; aggravated incest, as described in section
18-6-302 (1)(b); C.R.S.; human trafficking of a minor for sexual
servitude, as described in section 18-3-504 (2); C.R.S.; sexual
exploitation of children A CHILD, as described in section 18-6-403; C.R.S.;
procurement of a child for sexual exploitation, as described in section
18-6-404; C.R.S.; soliciting for child prostitution SOLICITING FOR
COMMERCIAL SEXUAL ACTIVITY WITH A CHILD, as described in section
18-7-402; C.R.S.; pandering of a child, as described in section 18-7-403;
C.R.S.; procurement of a child, as described in section 18-7-403.5;
C.R.S.; keeping a place of child prostitution KEEPING A PLACE OF
COMMERCIAL SEXUAL ACTIVITY WITH A CHILD, as described in section
18-7-404; C.R.S.; pimping of a child, as described in section 18-7-405;
C.R.S.; inducement of child prostitution INDUCEMENT OF COMMERCIAL
SEXUAL ACTIVITY WITH A CHILD, as described in section 18-7-405.5;
C.R.S.; patronizing a prostituted child ENGAGING IN COMMERCIAL SEXUAL
ACTIVITY WITH A CHILD, as described in section 18-7-406; C.R.S.; internet
luring of a child, as described in section 18-3-306; C.R.S.; internet sexual
exploitation of a child, as described in section 18-3-405.4; C.R.S.;
wholesale promotion of obscenity to a minor, as described in section
-17- SB26-075

18-7-102 (1.5); C.R.S.; promotion of obscenity to a minor, as described
in section 18-7-102 (2.5); C.R.S.; sexual assault, as described in section
18-3-402 (1)(d) and (1)(e); C.R.S.; OR sexual assault in the second degree
as it existed prior to July 1, 2000, as described in section 18-3-403 (1)(e)
and (1)(e.5); C.R.S.;
(II) EACH OF THE FOLLOWING OFFENSES, AS THEY EXISTED PRIOR
TO JULY 1, 2026: SOLICITING FOR CHILD PROSTITUTION, IN VIOLATION OF
SECTION 18-7-402; KEEPING A PLACE OF CHILD PROSTITUTION, IN
VIOLATION OF SECTION 18-7-404; INDUCEMENT OF CHILD PROSTITUTION,
IN VIOLATION OF SECTION 18-7-405.5; OR PATRONIZING A PROSTITUTED
CHILD, IN VIOLATION OF SECTION 18-7-406; or
(III) Criminal attempt, conspiracy, or solicitation to commit any
of the acts specified in this paragraph (c) SUBSECTION (2.5)(c).
SECTION 22. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 18-1.3-101, amend
(7) introductory portion and (7)(i) as follows:
18-1.3-101. Pretrial diversion - appropriation - repeal.
(7) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, an
individual accused of any of the following sexual offenses is not eligible
for participation in a diversion program established in a jurisdiction that
receives state moneys MONEY for the creation or operation of diversion
programs pursuant to this section:
(i) Any child prostitution AN offense in part 4 of article 7 of this
title TITLE 18.
SECTION 23. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 18-1.3-1003,
amend (5)(a)(X) as follows:
18-1.3-1003. Definitions.
As used in this part 10, unless the context otherwise requires:
-18- SB26-075

(5) (a) "Sex offense" means any of the following offenses:
(X) ENGAGING IN COMMERCIAL SEXUAL ACTIVITY WITH A CHILD,
AS DESCRIBED IN SECTION 18-7-406, OR patronizing a prostituted child, as
described in section 18-7-406, AS IT EXISTED PRIOR TO JULY 1, 2026;
SECTION 24. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 18-3-411, amend
(1) as follows:
18-3-411. Sex offenses against children - limitation for
commencing proceedings - evidence - statutory privilege - definition.
(1) As used in this section, "unlawful sexual offense" means:
(a) Enticement of a child, as described in section 18-3-305; sexual
assault, as described in section 18-3-402, when the victim at the time of
the commission of the act is a child less than fifteen years of age; sexual
assault in the first degree, as described in section 18-3-402, as it existed
prior to July 1, 2000, when the victim at the time of the commission of the
act is a child less than fifteen years of age; sexual assault in the second
degree, as described in section 18-3-403 (1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(c), (1)(d),
(1)(g), or (1)(h), as it existed prior to July 1, 2000, when the victim at the
time of the commission of the act is a child less than fifteen years of age,
or as described in section 18-3-403 (1)(e), as it existed prior to July 1,
2000, when the victim is less than fifteen years of age and the actor is at
least four years older than the victim; unlawful sexual contact, as
described in section 18-3-404 (1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(c), (1)(d), (1)(f), or (1)(g),
when the victim at the time of the commission of the act is a child less
than fifteen years of age; sexual assault in the third degree, as described
in section 18-3-404 (1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(c), (1)(d), (1)(f), or (1)(g), as it
existed prior to July 1, 2000, when the victim at the time of the
commission of the act is a child less than fifteen years of age; sexual
-19- SB26-075

assault on a child, as described in section 18-3-405; sexual assault on a
child by one in a position of trust, as described in section 18-3-405.3;
aggravated incest, as described in section 18-6-302; human trafficking of
a minor for sexual servitude, as described in section 18-3-504 (2); sexual
exploitation of a child, as described in section 18-6-403; procurement of
a child for sexual exploitation, as described in section 18-6-404; indecent
exposure, as described in section 18-7-302; soliciting for child
prostitution SOLICITING FOR COMMERCIAL SEXUAL ACTIVITY WITH A
CHILD, as described in section 18-7-402; pandering of a child, as
described in section 18-7-403; procurement of a child, as described in
section 18-7-403.5; keeping a place of child prostitution KEEPING A PLACE
OF COMMERCIAL SEXUAL ACTIVITY WITH A CHILD, as described in section
18-7-404; pimping of a child, as described in section 18-7-405;
inducement of child prostitution INDUCEMENT OF COMMERCIAL SEXUAL
ACTIVITY WITH A CHILD, as described in section 18-7-405.5; patronizing
a prostituted child ENGAGING IN COMMERCIAL SEXUAL ACTIVITY WITH A
CHILD, as described in section 18-7-406; class 4 felony internet luring of
a child, as described in section 18-3-306 (3); internet sexual exploitation
of a child, as described in section 18-3-405.4; OR unlawful electronic
sexual communication, as described in section 18-3-418;
(b) EACH OF THE FOLLOWING OFFENSES, AS THEY EXISTED PRIOR
TO JULY 1, 2026: SOLICITING FOR CHILD PROSTITUTION, IN VIOLATION OF
SECTION 18-7-402; KEEPING A PLACE OF CHILD PROSTITUTION, IN
VIOLATION OF SECTION 18-7-404; INDUCEMENT OF CHILD PROSTITUTION,
IN VIOLATION OF SECTION 18-7-405.5; OR PATRONIZING A PROSTITUTED
CHILD, IN VIOLATION OF SECTION 18-7-406; or
(c) Criminal attempt, conspiracy, or solicitation to commit any of
-20- SB26-075

the acts specified in this subsection (1).
SECTION 25. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 18-3-412, amend
(1) as follows:
18-3-412. Habitual sex offenders against children - indictment
or information - verdict of the jury.
(1) For the purpose of this section, "unlawful sexual offense"
means:
(a) Sexual assault, as described in section 18-3-402, when the
victim at the time of the commission of the act is a child less than fifteen
years of age, sexual assault in the first degree, as described in section
18-3-402, as it existed prior to July 1, 2000, when the victim at the time
of the commission of the act is a child less than fifteen years of age;
sexual assault in the second degree, as described in section 18-3-403
(1)(a), (1)(b), (1)(c), (1)(d), (1)(g), or (1)(h), as it existed prior to July 1,
2000, when the victim at the time of the commission of the act is a child
less than fifteen years of age, or as described in section 18-3-403 (1)(e),
as it existed prior to July 1, 2000, when the victim is less than fifteen
years of age and the actor is at least four years older than the victim;
unlawful sexual contact, as described in section 18-3-404 (1)(a), (1)(b),
(1)(c), (1)(d), (1)(f), or (1)(g), when the victim at the time of the
commission of the act is a child less than fifteen years of age; sexual
assault in the third degree, as described in section 18-3-404 (1)(a), (1)(b),
(1)(c), (1)(d), (1)(f), or (1)(g), as it existed prior to July 1, 2000, when the
victim at the time of the commission of the act is a child less than fifteen
years of age; sexual assault on a child, as described in section 18-3-405;
sexual assault on a child by one in a position of trust, as described in
section 18-3-405.3; aggravated incest, as described in section 18-6-302;
-21- SB26-075

human trafficking of a minor for sexual servitude, as described in section
18-3-504 (2); sexual exploitation of a child, as described in section
18-6-403; procurement of a child for sexual exploitation, as described in
section 18-6-404; soliciting for child prostitution SOLICITING FOR
COMMERCIAL SEXUAL ACTIVITY WITH A CHILD, as described in section
18-7-402; pandering of a child, as described in section 18-7-403;
procurement of a child, as described in section 18-7-403.5; keeping a
place of child prostitution KEEPING A PLACE OF COMMERCIAL SEXUAL
ACTIVITY WITH A CHILD, as described in section 18-7-404; pimping of a
child, as described in section 18-7-405; inducement of child prostitution
INDUCEMENT OF COMMERCIAL SEXUAL ACTIVITY WITH A CHILD, as
described in section 18-7-405.5; patronizing a prostituted child OR
ENGAGING IN COMMERCIAL SEXUAL ACTIVITY WITH A CHILD, as described
in section 18-7-406;
(b) EACH OF THE FOLLOWING OFFENSES, AS THEY EXISTED PRIOR
TO JULY 1, 2026: SOLICITING FOR CHILD PROSTITUTION, IN VIOLATION OF
SECTION 18-7-402; KEEPING A PLACE OF CHILD PROSTITUTION, IN
VIOLATION OF SECTION 18-7-404; INDUCEMENT OF CHILD PROSTITUTION,
IN VIOLATION OF SECTION 18-7-405.5; OR PATRONIZING A PROSTITUTED
CHILD, IN VIOLATION OF SECTION 18-7-406; or
(c) Criminal attempt, conspiracy, or solicitation to commit any of
the acts specified in this subsection (1).
SECTION 26. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 18-12-108, amend
(7)(u) as follows:
18-12-108. Possession of weapons by previous offenders.
(7) In addition to a conviction for felony crime as defined in
section 24-4.1-302 (1), a felony conviction or adjudication for one of the
-22- SB26-075

following felonies prohibits a person from possessing, using, or carrying
upon the person a firearm as defined in section 18-1-901 (3)(h) or any
other weapon that is subject to this article 12 pursuant to subsection (1)
or (3) of this section:
(u) KEEPING A PLACE OF COMMERCIAL SEXUAL ACTIVITY WITH A
CHILD, IN VIOLATION OF SECTION 18-7-404, AND keeping a place of child
prostitution in violation of section 18-7-404, AS IT EXISTED PRIOR TO JULY
1, 2026;
SECTION 27. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 18-17-103, amend
(5)(b) introductory portion and (5)(b)(VI) as follows:
18-17-103. Definitions.
As used in this article 17, unless the context otherwise requires:
(5) "Racketeering activity" means to commit, to attempt to
commit, to conspire to commit, or to solicit, coerce, or intimidate another
person to commit:
(b) Any violation of the following provisions of the Colorado
statutes or any criminal act committed in any jurisdiction of the United
States that, if committed in this state, would be a crime under the
following provisions of the Colorado statutes:
(VI) Offenses relating to morals, as defined in sections 18-7-102
(wholesale promotion of obscenity or promotion of obscenity), 18-7-203
(pandering), 18-7-206 (pimping), 18-7-402 (soliciting for child
prostitution COMMERCIAL SEXUAL ACTIVITY WITH A CHILD), 18-7-403
(pandering of a child), 18-7-404 (keeping a place of child prostitution
COMMERCIAL SEXUAL ACTIVITY WITH A CHILD), and 18-7-405 (pimping
of a child), AND THE OFFENSES IN SECTIONS 18-7-402, 18-7-404, AND
18-7-405, AS THOSE SECTIONS EXISTED PRIOR TO JULY 1, 2026;
-23- SB26-075

SECTION 28. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-4.1-302, amend
(1)(ll) as follows:
24-4.1-302. Definitions.
As used in this part 3, and for no other purpose, including the
expansion of the rights of any defendant:
(1) "Crime" means any of the following offenses, acts, and
violations as defined by the statutes of the state of Colorado, whether
committed by an adult or a juvenile:
(ll) Child prostitution, in violation of section 18-7-401, C.R.S.;
soliciting for child prostitution SOLICITING FOR COMMERCIAL SEXUAL
ACTIVITY WITH A CHILD, in violation of section 18-7-402; C.R.S.;
procurement of a child for sexual exploitation, in violation of section
18-6-404; C.R.S.; pimping of a child, in violation of section 18-7-405;
C.R.S.; inducement of child prostitution INDUCEMENT OF COMMERCIAL
SEXUAL ACTIVITY WITH A CHILD, in violation of section 18-7-405.5;
C.R.S.; or patronizing a prostituted child ENGAGING IN COMMERCIAL
SEXUAL ACTIVITY WITH A CHILD, in violation of section 18-7-406; C.R.S.
SOLICITING FOR CHILD PROSTITUTION, IN VIOLATION OF SECTION 18-7-402,
AS IT EXISTED PRIOR TO JULY 1, 2026; INDUCEMENT OF CHILD
PROSTITUTION, IN VIOLATION OF SECTION 18-7-405.5, AS IT EXISTED PRIOR
TO JULY 1, 2026; OR PATRONIZING A PROSTITUTED CHILD, IN VIOLATION OF
SECTION 18-7-406, AS IT EXISTED PRIOR TO JULY 1, 2026;
SECTION 29. Effective date - applicability. This act takes
effect July 1, 2026, and applies to offenses committed on or after said
date.
SECTION 30. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
-24- SB26-075

preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
-25- SB26-075